Utah statutes.
76-5-403.1.   Sodomy on a child.

(1)  A person commits sodomy upon a child if the actor engages in any sexual act upon or with a child who is under the age of 14, involving the genitals or anus of the actor or the child and the mouth or anus of either person, regardless of the sex of either participant.

(2)  Sodomy upon a child is a first degree felony punishable by a term of imprisonment of:

(a)  except as provided in Subsection (2)(b), not less than 25 years and which may be for life; or

(b) life without parole, if the trier of fact finds that:

(i)  during the course of the commission of the sodomy upon a child the defendant caused serious bodily injury to another; or

(ii)  at the time of the commission of the sodomy upon a child, the defendant was previously convicted of a grievous sexual offense.

(3)  Imprisonment under this section is mandatory in accordance with Section 76-3-406.

